Washington statutes.
RCW 10.05.055

Child welfare services.

Child welfare services provided under chapter 74.13 RCW pursuant to a deferred prosecution ordered under RCW 10.05.060 may not be construed to prohibit the department from providing services or undertaking proceedings pursuant to chapter 13.34 or 26.44 RCW.

[ 2002 c 219 s 12.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2002 c 219: See note following RCW 9A.42.037.